Tennessee, session 114, SB2126.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) As used in this section, "real estate investment trust" or "REIT" means a
business entity that qualifies as a real estate investment trust, as defined in 26 U.S.C. §
856, and that purchases or acquires for consideration ten (10) or more single-family
homes in this state in calendar year 2025.
(b) Using existing available data and deed records, on or before December 31,
2026, the comptroller of the treasury shall submit a report to the governor, the speaker of
the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chair of the state and local
government committee of the senate, and the chair of the committee of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over housing containing a summary of the following
de-identified information related to REITs' purchases and sales of single-family homes in
this state for calendar year 2025:
(1) The number of single-family homes purchased by each REIT in the
calendar year 2025, including the appraised value of each home purchased; and
(2) The number of homes described in subdivision (b)(1) that were:
(A) Acquired through foreclosure;
(B) Sold by each REIT during the same year; and
(C) Used as rental properties during the same year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2126
010785
- 1 -